Massachusetts, session 194th, H4077.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 51M the
following section:-
Section 51N. A facility licensed pursuant to this chapter shall make any necessary
alterations or upgrades to its buildings, facilities and other property to enhance the physical
accessibility of the facility. The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter
30A, to provide criteria for the necessity of physical accessibility enhancements and minimum
standards for such enhancements, which shall include requirements for: (i) the installation of
automatic doors; (ii) the use of chairs with handles; (iii) the construction or retrofitting of wider
hallways; (iv) the installation of railings in bathrooms; and (v) any other alterations or upgrades
that the department deems necessary to enhancing the physical accessibility of facilities.
of 1